trunk/incubator/apertium-pl-ru.ru.dix.xml
    <pardef n="русск/ий__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ий</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ий</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ий</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ая</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ую</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ой</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ое</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ого</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ому</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ое</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ом</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>им</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ие</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ими</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ими</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ими</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ими</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>их</l>
          <r>ий<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="абатский"><i>абатск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="абстракционистский"><i>абстракционистск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="авантюристический"><i>авантюристическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="автобиографический"><i>автобиографическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="агрономический"><i>агрономическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аджарский"><i>аджарск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="адренолитический"><i>адренолитическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="адъютантский"><i>адъютантск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="айнский"><i>айнск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="актёрский"><i>актёрск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="албанский"><i>албанск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аллегорический"><i>аллегорическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="американский"><i>американск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аналогический"><i>аналогическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="анахронический"><i>анахроническ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="анекдотический"><i>анекдотическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="антигигиенический"><i>антигигиеническ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="антисептический"><i>антисептическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="апатический"><i>апатическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="апоплексический"><i>апоплексическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аргентинский"><i>аргентинск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="арктический"><i>арктическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="артиллерийский"><i>артиллерийск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="асептический"><i>асептическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="астурийский"><i>астурийск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аутентический"><i>аутентическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="багдадский"><i>багдадск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="белорусский"><i>белорусск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="биографический"><i>биографическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="боливийский"><i>боливийск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бразильский"><i>бразильск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бретонский"><i>бретонск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бюрократический"><i>бюрократическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="великосветский"><i>великосветск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="византийский"><i>византийск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="витебский"><i>витебск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="воинский"><i>воинск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="вятский"><i>вятск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="геометрический"><i>геометрическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="гигантский"><i>гигантск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="грамматический"><i>грамматическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="гэльский"><i>гэльск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="деонтический"><i>деонтическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="дурацкий"><i>дурацк</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="зверский"><i>зверск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ипсвичский"><i>ипсвичск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="исторический"><i>историческ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="июньский"><i>июньск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="карагандинский"><i>карагандинск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="киргизский"><i>киргизск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="коагулометрический"><i>коагулометрическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ковбойский"><i>ковбойск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="кодикологический"><i>кодикологическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="коксохимический"><i>коксохимическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="коллекторский"><i>коллекторск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="колониалистский"><i>колониалистск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="колофонский"><i>колофонск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="колхский"><i>колхск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="комагматический"><i>комагматическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="комбедовский"><i>комбедовск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="комендантский"><i>комендантск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="комиссионерский"><i>комиссионерск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="коммерческий"><i>коммерческ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="компаративистский"><i>компаративистск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="корнский"><i>корнск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="лимбургский"><i>лимбургск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="мексиканский"><i>мексиканск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="мэнский"><i>мэнск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ноябрьский"><i>ноябрьск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="периодический"><i>периодическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="политический"><i>политическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ребяческий"><i>ребяческ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="сельский"><i>сельск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="социалистический"><i>социалистическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="творческий"><i>творческ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="университетский"><i>университетск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="французский"><i>французск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="читательский"><i>читательск</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="этический"><i>этическ</i><par n="русск/ий__adj"/></e>
